Illinois, session 104th, HB2755.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Commemorative Dates Act is amended by 5adding Section 200 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 490/200 new)7    Sec. 200. Emmett Till Day. July 25 of each year is 8designated as Emmett Till Day, to be observed throughout the 9State as a day in honor and remembrance of Emmett Till.